Illinois, session 104th, SB3601.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Professional AI Oversight Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Artificial intelligence" has the meaning given to that 8term in Section 2-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act.9    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 10Professional Regulation.11    "License" has the meaning given to that term in Section 122105-5 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois.13    "Licensee" means any person licensed in a regulated 14occupation by the Department.15    "Regulated occupation" means an occupation regulated by 16the Department that requires a person to obtain a license or 17State certification to practice the occupation. "Regulated 18occupation" does not include occupations held by licensed 19professionals, as defined in Section 10 of the Wellness and 20Oversight for Psychological Resources Act, or occupations 21exempted under Section 35 of the Wellness and Oversight for 22Psychological Resources Act.23    "State certification" means a State-granted authorization   SB3601- 2 -LRB104 19072 AAS 32517 b1given to a person to use the word "State-certified" as part of 2a designated title for a specified occupation:3        (1) based on the person meeting personal 4    qualifications established under State law; and5        (2) where State law prohibits a noncertified person 6    from using the word "State-certified" as part of a 7    designated title for a specified occupation but does not 8    otherwise prohibit a noncertified person from engaging in 9    the specified occupation for compensation. 10    Section 10. Use of artificial intelligence disclosure.11    (a) A licensee shall prominently disclose when a person 12who is paying for a service provided by the licensee is 13interacting with artificial intelligence.14    (b) The disclosure required under this Section shall:15        (1) be provided (i) verbally at the start of an oral 16    exchange or conversation and (ii) in writing before a 17    written exchange; and18        (2) notify the person of the specific purpose of the 19    artificial intelligence that will be used in the 20    interaction.21    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to permit a 22licensee to provide services in a regulated occupation through 23artificial intelligence without meeting any other requirements 24of the regulated occupation.   SB3601- 3 -LRB104 19072 AAS 32517 b1    Section 15. Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules 2to administer and enforce this Act. 3    Section 20. Enforcement and penalties.4    (a) Any individual, corporation, or entity found in 5violation of this Act shall pay a civil penalty to the 6Department in an amount not to exceed $2,500 per violation, as 7determined by the Department, with penalties assessed based on 8the degree of harm and the circumstances of the violation. The 9civil penalty shall be assessed by the Department after a 10hearing is held in accordance with Section 2105-100 of the 11Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. An individual, 12corporation, or entity that is found in violation of this Act 13shall pay the civil penalty within 60 days after the date of 14the issuance of an order by the Department imposing the civil 15penalty. The Department's order shall constitute a judgment 16and may be filed and executed in the same manner as any 17judgment from a court of record.18    (b) The Department may investigate any actual, alleged, or 19suspected violation of this Act. 20    Section 25. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 21Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 22    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)23    Sec. 2MMMM. Required disclosure of the use of artificial   SB3601- 4 -LRB104 19072 AAS 32517 b1intelligence to engage in trade and commerce.2    (a) As used in this Section, "artificial intelligence" has 3the meaning given to that term in Section 2-101 of the Illinois 4Human Rights Act.5    (b) It is an unlawful practice within the meaning of this 6Act for any person to use, prompt, or otherwise cause 7artificial intelligence to interact with a person while 8engaging in trade and commerce without clearly and 9conspicuously disclosing to the person with whom the 10artificial intelligence interacts, if asked or prompted by 11that person, that the person is interacting with artificial 12intelligence and not a human. 13    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 14severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect on 16January 1, 2027.